Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4975.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9e. (1) An electric utility shall do all of the following: (a) Automatically provide a $100.00 credit on a customer's electric utility bill if that customer had 4 service interruptions lasting 1 or more hours in the preceding 12 months. (b) Automatically provide a $200.00 credit on a customer's electric utility bill if that customer had more than 4 service interruptions lasting 1 or more hours in the preceding 12 months. (2) Beginning 5 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and every 5 years thereafter, the commission shall adjust the credits in subsection (1). The commission shall adjust the credits in subsection (1) by comparing the percentage increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index for the preceding year by the corresponding Consumer Price Index 5 years earlier. The commission shall multiply that percentage change by the amounts in subsection (1). The commission shall round up each dollar value adjustment made under this subsection to the nearest dollar. The commission shall announce the adjustments made under this subsection by June 1 of the year the adjustment takes effect. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (b) "Service interruption" means a full or partial loss of electric service.